apertium-szl.szl.dix
<pardef n="wid/zieć__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>zieć</l>      <r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zã</l>        <r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zi</l>        <r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zymy</l>      <r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zōm</l>       <r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ź</l>         <r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zi</l>        <r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__wiydziołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ziano<b/>było</l><r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zy</l>        <r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zōnc</l>      <r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zōnc</l>      <r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>z</l>         <r>zieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__widziany"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ber/ać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ać</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōm</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ŏ</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōmy</l>       <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ajōm</l>      <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ej</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano<b/>było</l><r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ajōnc</l>     <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ajōnc</l>     <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kŏ/zać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>zać</l>       <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>żã</l>        <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>że</l>        <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>żymy</l>      <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>żōm</l>       <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ż</l>         <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>z</l>         <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zano<b/>było</l><r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>za</l>        <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>żōnc</l>      <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>żōnc</l>      <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zan</l>       <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="skŏ/zać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>zać</l>       <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>żã</l>        <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>że</l>        <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>żymy</l>      <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>żōm</l>       <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ż</l>         <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>z</l>         <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytołch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zano<b/>było</l><r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zan</l>       <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>za</l>        <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="przeklud/zać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>zać</l>       <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zã</l>        <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zi</l>        <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robi"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zymy</l>      <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zōm</l>       <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ź</l>         <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytej"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zi</l>        <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__robiōłch"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zōno<b/>było</l><r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>za</l>        <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__beranie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zajōnc</l>    <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zajōnc</l>    <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__bydōncy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zan</l>       <r>zać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="HTML__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-a</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-owi</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>owi</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ym</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ym</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-u</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-u</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="AIM">             <i>AIM</i><par n="HTML__n"/></e>
<e lm="AOL">             <i>AOL</i><par n="HTML__n"/></e>
<e lm="HTML">            <i>HTML</i><par n="HTML__n"/></e>
<e lm="PIN">             <i>PIN</i><par n="HTML__n"/></e>
<e lm="SGML">            <i>SGML</i><par n="HTML__n"/></e>
<e lm="SQL">             <i>SQL</i><par n="HTML__n"/></e>
<e lm="URL">             <i>URL</i><par n="HTML__n"/></e>
<e lm="XML">             <i>XML</i><par n="HTML__n"/></e>
<e lm="XUL">             <i>XUL</i><par n="HTML__n"/></e>
<e lm="kŏzać">           <i>kŏ</i><par n="kŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lizać">           <i>li</i><par n="kŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nakŏzać">         <i>nakŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pokŏzać">         <i>pokŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przekŏzać">       <i>przekŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rozkŏzać">        <i>rozkŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="siedzieć">        <i>sied</i><par n="wid/zieć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skŏzać">          <i>skŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="smerdzieć">       <i>smerd</i><par n="wid/zieć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="śmierdzieć">      <i>śmierd</i><par n="wid/zieć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ukŏzać">          <i>ukŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="widzieć">         <i>wid</i><par n="wid/zieć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wkludzać">        <i>wkludz</i><par n="przeklud/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wykŏzać">         <i>wykŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zakŏzać">         <i>zakŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zôbowiōnzać">     <i>zôbowiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zawiōnzać">       <i>zawiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wiōnzać">         <i>wiōn</i><par n="kŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ôbwiōnzać">       <i>ôbwiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ôdkŏzać">         <i>ôdkŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wymazać">         <i>wyma</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ulizać">          <i>uli</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dowiōnzać">       <i>dowiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nawiōnzać">       <i>nawiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ôwiōnzać">        <i>ôwiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="powiōnzać">       <i>powiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="podwiōnzać">      <i>podwiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przewiōnzać">     <i>przewiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prziwiōnzać">     <i>prziwiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rozwiōnzać">      <i>rozwiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zwiōnzać">        <i>zwiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wywiōnzać">       <i>wywiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ôdwiōnzać">       <i>ôdwiōn</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dokŏzać">         <i>dokŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ôkŏzać">          <i>ôkŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przikŏzać">       <i>przikŏ</i><par n="skŏ/zać__vblex"/></e>
